Utah statutes.
17B-2a-503.   Additional irrigation district powers -- No authority to levy property tax.

(1)  In addition to the powers conferred on an irrigation district under Section 17B-1-103, an irrigation district may:

(a)  issue bonds as provided in and subject to Chapter 1, Part 11, Local District Bonds, to carry out the purposes of the district;

(b)  purchase stock of an irrigation, canal, or reservoir company;

(c)  enter upon any land in the district to make a survey and to locate and construct a canal and any necessary lateral;

(d)  convey water rights or other district property to the United States as partial or full consideration under a contract with the United States;

(e)  pursuant to a contract with the United States, lease or rent water to private land, an entryman, or a municipality in the neighborhood of the district;

(f)  if authorized under a contract with the United States, collect money on behalf of the United States in connection with a federal reclamation project and assume the incident duties and liabilities;

(g)  acquire water from inside or outside the state;

(h)  subject to Subsection (2), lease, rent, or sell water not needed by the owners of land within the district:

(i)  to a municipality, corporation, association, or individual inside or outside the district;

(ii)  for irrigation or any other beneficial use; and

(iii)  at a price and on terms that the board considers appropriate; and

(i)  repair a break in a reservoir or canal or remedy any other district disaster.

(2) (a)  The term of a lease or rental agreement under Subsection (1)(h) may not exceed five years.

(b)  A vested or prescriptive right to the use of water may not attach to the land because of a lease or rental of water under Subsection (1)(h).

(3)  Notwithstanding Subsection 17B-1-103(2)(g), an irrigation district may not levy a property tax.

